Illinois, session 104th, SB2694.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Commemorative Dates Act is amended by 5adding Section 197 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 490/197 new)7    Sec. 197. Charlie Kirk Day. The tenth day of September of 8each year is designated as Charlie Kirk Day, to be observed 9throughout the State as a day set apart to honor the political 10activist who was born and raised in the State of Illinois and 11who dedicated his life, up to and until the very end of his 12life, to the free and open exchange of ideas.